Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.130

Unlawful use of consignor's net proceeds.

It shall be unlawful for the licensee to use for his or her own purposes consignor's net proceeds, or funds received by such licensee to purchase livestock on order, through recourse to the so-called "float" in the bank account, or in any other manner.

[ 2011 c 336 s 433; 1959 c 107 s 13.]